Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.240

Written operating agreements.

The secretary and each of the professional licensing and disciplinary boards listed in RCW 18.130.040(2)(b) shall enter into written operating agreements on administrative procedures with input from the regulated profession and the public. The intent of these agreements is to provide a process for the department to consult each board on administrative matters and to ensure that the administration and staff functions effectively enable each board to fulfill its statutory responsibilities in a manner that supports the health care delivery system and evidence-based practices across all health professions. The agreements shall include, but not be limited to, the following provisions:

(1) Administrative activities supporting the board's policies, goals, and objectives;

(2) Development and review of the agency budget as it relates to the board;

(3) Board-related personnel issues;

(4) Use of performance audits to evaluate the consistent use of common business practices where appropriate; and

(5) Calculation and reporting of timelines and performance measures.

The agreements shall be reviewed and revised in like manner if appropriate at the beginning of each biennium, and at other times upon written request by the secretary or the board. Any dispute between a board and the department, including the terms of the operating agreement, must be mediated and determined by a representative of the office of financial management.

[ 2013 c 81 s 7; 1998 c 245 s 73; 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 304.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2013 c 81: See note following RCW 18.25.0167.